Washington statutes.
RCW 43.01.047

Vacations—Provisions not applicable to individual providers, family child care providers, adult family home providers, or language access providers.

RCW 43.01.040 through 43.01.044 do not apply to individual providers under RCW * 74.39A.220 through 74.39A.300, family child care providers under RCW 41.56.028, or adult family home providers under RCW 41.56.029, or language access providers under RCW 41.56.510.

[ 2010 c 296 s 6; 2007 c 184 s 5; 2006 c 54 s 5; 2004 c 3 s 4.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 74.39A.220 was repealed by 2018 c 278 s 32.

Conflict with federal requirements—2010 c 296: See note following RCW 41.56.510.

Part headings not law—Severability—Conflict with federal requirements—2007 c 184: See notes following RCW 41.56.029.

Conflict with federal requirements—Short title—Effective date—2006 c 54: See RCW 41.56.913 through 41.56.915.

Severability—Effective date—2004 c 3: See notes following RCW 74.39A.270.